Hawaii statutes.
§92F-18 Agency implementation. (a)
Each agency shall:

(1) Issue instructions and guidelines necessary to
effectuate this chapter; and

(2) Take steps to assure that all its employees and
officers responsible for the collection, maintenance, use, and dissemination of
government records are informed of the requirements of this chapter.

(b) Each agency shall compile a public report
describing the records it routinely uses or maintains using forms prescribed by
the office of information practices. The public reports shall be filed with
the office of information practices on or before December 31, 1994. The
public reports shall include:

(1) The name and location of each set of records;

(2) The authority under which the records are
maintained;

(3) The categories of individuals for whom records
are maintained;

(4) The categories of information or data maintained
in the records;

(5) The categories of sources of information in the
records;

(6) The categories of uses and disclosures made of
the records;

(7) The agencies and categories of persons outside of
the agency which routinely use the records;

(8) The records routinely used by the agency which
are maintained by:

(A) Another agency; or

(B) A person other than an agency;

(9) The policies and practices of the agency
regarding storage, retrievability, access controls, retentions, and disposal of
the information maintained in records;

(10) The title, business address, and business
telephone number of the agency officer or officers responsible for the records;

(11) The agency procedures whereby an individual may
request access to records; and

(12) The number of written requests for access within
the preceding year, the number denied, the number of lawsuits initiated against
the agency under this part, and the number of suits in which access was
granted.

(c) Each agency shall supplement or amend its
public report, or file a new report, on or before July 1 of each
subsequent year, to ensure that the information remains accurate and complete.
Each agency shall file the supplemental, amended, or new report with the office
of information practices, which shall make the reports available for public
inspection. [L 1988, c 262, pt of §1; am L 1989, c 192, §4; am L 1991, c 167,
§2; am L 1992, c 118, §2; am L 1993, c 57, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next